Illinois, session 104th, HB4739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 52-3.214, 10-20.88, and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)7    Sec. 2-3.214. School ventilation document. Subject to 8appropriation, the State Board of Education, in consultation 9with the Department of Public Health, shall develop an 10educational document explaining, at a minimum, the values of 11good indoor air quality and shall supply the document in a 12Portable Document Format (PDF) to school districts after an 13appropriation is made for this purpose. 14    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)15    Sec. 10-20.88. School ventilation.16    (a) As used in this Section, "active classroom" means a 17room currently being used for any duration of in-person 18instruction.19    (b) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 20from an appropriation made for this purpose, a school district 21shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped with an 22air quality monitor.   HB4739 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18454 LNS 31896 b1    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)2    Sec. 34-18.88. School ventilation.3    (a) As used in this Section, "active classroom" means a 4room currently being used for any duration of in-person 5instruction.6    (b) Subject to funding from the State Board of Education 7from an appropriation made for this purpose, the school 8district shall ensure that all active classrooms are equipped 9with an air quality monitor.